New Jersey, session 222, S265.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1943, c.188 (C.52:14-17.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    All mileage in lieu of actual expenses of transportation allowed an officer or employee of the State traveling by [his] the person's own automobile on official business away from [his] the person's designated post of duty or official station shall be at the standard mileage rate [of $0.18 per mile unless otherwise adjusted by law] set by the federal Internal Revenue Service, or its successor, and in effect at the time the expense is incurred, to calculate deductible costs of operating an automobile for business purposes. (cf: P.L.1980, c.19, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1980, c.19 (C.52:14-17.1a) is repealed. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, the State's mileage reimbursement rate is $0.18 cents per mile, adjusted biannually to reflect changes in gasoline prices. Annual appropriations acts have adjusted this mileage reimbursement rate. This bill provides that the mileage reimbursement rate payable to a State officer or employee driving a private automobile on State business will be the same as the standard mileage rate established by the federal Internal Revenue Service (IRS) for the deductible cost of operating an automobile for business purposes. The bill repeals the provision of current law that requires adjustment twice each year to reflect changes in the price of gasoline.